Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-430
Power to cross highways and railroads.

The district may dig ditches and drains under and across railroads and public highways.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 24, p. 484;

R.S.1913, § 1894;

C.S.1922, § 1842;

C.S.1929, § 31-530;

R.S.1943, § 31-430.

Section is constitutional and the county can impose no conditions. Douglas County v. Papillion Drainage District, 92 Neb. 771, 139 N.W. 718 (1913).